Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.090

Partition, how made.

In making the partition, the referees shall divide the property, and allot the several portions thereof to the respective parties, quality and quantity relatively considered, according to the respective rights of the parties as determined by the court, designating the several portions by proper landmarks, and may employ a surveyor with the necessary assistants to aid them therein. The referees shall make a report of their proceedings, specifying therein the manner of executing their trust, describing the property divided and the shares allotted to each party, with a particular description of each share.

[Code 1881 s 560; 1877 p 118 s 565; 1869 p 134 s 513; RRS s 846.]